Tennessee statutes. Title 61 Partnerships
Part 5

Contributions and Distributions

61-3-501. Form of contribution and acceptance.

A contribution may consist of property transferred to, services performed for, or another benefit provided to the limited partnership or an agreement to transfer property to, perform services for, or provide another benefit to the partnership.

Neither a purported contribution nor an offer of consideration to make a contribution must be treated as a contribution to a limited partnership until:

The contribution is accepted by the affirmative vote or consent of all general partners; and

The amount and value of the contribution are recorded in the required information of the limited partnership.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-502. Liability for contribution.

A person's obligation to make a contribution to a limited partnership is not excused by the person's death, disability, termination, or other inability to perform personally.

If a person does not fulfill an obligation to make a contribution other than money, the person is obligated at the option of the limited partnership to contribute money equal to the value, as stated in the required information, of the part of the contribution that has not been made. The foregoing option is in addition to, and not in lieu of, any other rights, including the right to specific performance, that the limited partnership may have against the partner under the partnership agreement or applicable law.

A conditional obligation of a partner to make a contribution or return money or other property to a limited partnership shall not be enforced unless the conditions to the obligation have been satisfied or waived as to or by the partner. Conditional obligations include contributions payable upon a discretionary call of a limited partnership or a general partner prior to the time the call occurs.

The obligation of a person to make a contribution may be compromised only by the affirmative vote or consent of all the partners. If a creditor of a limited partnership extends credit or otherwise acts in reliance on an obligation described in subsection (a) without knowledge or notice of a compromise under this subsection (d), the creditor may enforce the obligation to the extent that, in extending credit, the creditor reasonably relied on the obligation of a partner to make a contribution.

A partnership agreement may provide that the interest of any partner who fails to make any contribution that the partner is obligated to make is subject to specified penalties for, or specified consequences of, the failure. The penalty or consequence may take the form of:

Reducing or eliminating the defaulting partner's proportionate interest in the limited partnership;

Subordinating the defaulting partner's partnership interest to that of nondefaulting partners;

A forced sale of the defaulting partner's partnership interest;

Forfeiture of the defaulting partner's partnership interest;

The lending by other partners of the amount necessary to meet the defaulting partner's commitment;

A fixing of the value of the defaulting partner's partnership interest by appraisal or by formula and redemption or sale of the defaulting partner's partnership interest at such value; or

Other penalty or consequence.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-503. Sharing of and right to distributions before dissolution.

Any distribution made by a limited partnership before its dissolution and winding up must be shared among the partners on the basis of the value, as stated in the required information when the limited partnership decides to make the distribution, of the contributions the limited partnership has received from each partner, except to the extent necessary to comply with a transfer effective under § 61-3-702 or charging order in effect under § 61-3-703.

A person has a right to a distribution before the dissolution and winding up of a limited partnership only if the partnership decides to make an interim distribution. A person's dissociation does not entitle the person to a distribution.

A person does not have a right to demand or receive a distribution from a limited partnership in any form other than money. Except as otherwise provided in § 61-3-810(f), a partnership may distribute an asset in kind only if each part of the asset is fungible with each other part and each person receives a percentage of the asset equal in value to the person's share of distributions.

If a partner or transferee becomes entitled to receive a distribution, the partner or transferee has the status of, and is entitled to all remedies available to, a creditor of the limited partnership with respect to the distribution. However, the partnership's obligation to make a distribution is subject to offset for any amount owed to the partnership by the partner or a person dissociated as a partner on whose account the distribution is made.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-504. Limitations on distributions.

A limited partnership may not make a distribution, including a distribution under § 61-3-810, if after the distribution:

The partnership would not be able to pay its debts as they become due in the ordinary course of the partnership's activities and affairs; or

The partnership's total assets would be less than the sum of its total liabilities, other than liabilities for which the recourse of creditors is limited to specified property, plus the amount that would be needed, if the partnership were to be dissolved and wound up at the time of the distribution, to satisfy the preferential rights upon dissolution and winding up of partners and transferees whose preferential rights are superior to the rights of persons receiving the distribution; provided, however, that the value of property that is subject to a liability for which the recourse of creditors is limited must be included in the total assets of the partnership, only to the extent the value of the property exceeds the liability.

A limited partnership may base a determination that a distribution is not prohibited under subsection (a) on:

Financial statements prepared on the basis of accounting practices and principles that are reasonable in the circumstances; or

A fair valuation or other method that is reasonable under the circumstances.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e), the effect of a distribution under subsection (a) is measured:

In the case of a distribution that consists of a redemption or other purchase by the limited partnership of a transferrable interest, or of a transfer to a partner in return for relinquishment of any of that person's rights as a partner, as of the earlier of:

The date money or other property is transferred or debt is incurred by the limited partnership; or

The date the person entitled to the distribution ceases to own the interest or right being acquired by the partnership in return for the distribution;

In the case of any other distribution of indebtedness, as of the date the indebtedness is distributed; and

In all other cases, as of the date:

The distribution is authorized, if the payment occurs not later than one hundred twenty (120) days after that date; or

The payment is made, if the payment occurs more than one hundred twenty (120) days after the distribution is authorized.

A limited partnership's indebtedness to a partner or transferee incurred by reason of a distribution made in accordance with this section is at parity with the partnership's indebtedness to its general, unsecured creditors, except to the extent subordinated by agreement.

A limited partnership's indebtedness, including indebtedness issued as a distribution, is not a liability for purposes of subsection (a) if the terms of the indebtedness provide that payment of principal and interest is made only if and to the extent that payment of a distribution could then be made under this section. If the indebtedness is issued as a distribution, each payment of principal or interest is treated as a distribution, the effect of which is measured on the date the payment is made.

In measuring the effect of a distribution under § 61-3-810, the liabilities of a dissolved limited partnership do not include any claim that has been disposed of under § 61-3-806, § 61-3-807, or § 61-3-808.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-505. Liability for improper distributions.

If a general partner consents to a distribution made in violation of § 61-3-504 and in consenting to the distribution fails to comply with § 61-3-409, the general partner is personally liable to the limited partnership for the amount of the distribution which exceeds the amount that could have been distributed without the violation of § 61-3-504.

A person that receives a distribution knowing that the distribution violated § 61-3-504 is personally liable to the limited partnership but only to the extent that the distribution received by the person exceeded the amount that could have been properly paid under § 61-3-504.

A general partner against which an action is commenced because the general partner is liable under subsection (a) may:

Implead any other person that is liable under subsection (a) and seek to enforce a right of contribution from the person; and

Implead any person that received a distribution in violation of subsection (b) and seek to enforce a right of contribution from the person in the amount the person received in violation of subsection (b).

An action under this section is barred unless commenced not later than two (2) years after the distribution.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.